Florida, session 2026, HB699.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 725.08, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
725.08 Design professional contracts entered into with
public agencies; limitation in indemnification.—
(5) This section does not affect contracts or agreements
entered into before May 25, 2000 the effective date of this
section.
Section 2. Section 725.09, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
725.09 Design professional contracts; limitation in
indemnification; standard of care.—
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb699-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 699 2026
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Design professional" means a person, as defined in s.
1.01, who is licensed in this state under chapter 481 as an
architect or landscape architect, under chapter 472 as a
surveyor, under chapter 471 as an engineer, or a geologist or
who is a registered interior designer, as defined in s. 481.203.
(b) "Professional services contract" means a written or
oral agreement relating to the planning, design, construction,
administration, study, evaluation, consulting, or other
professional and technical support services furnished in
connection with any actual or proposed construction,
improvement, alteration, repair, maintenance, operation,
management, relocation, demolition, excavation, or other
facility, land, air, water, or utility development or
improvement.
(2) Notwithstanding ss. 725.06 and 725.08, a professional
services contract entered into with a design professional on or
after July 1, 2026, is void and unenforceable if it:
(a) Requires the design professional to indemnify and hold
harmless a contracting party, an indemnitee, or a third party
from liability for damage other than liability for damage to the
extent caused by, or in proportion to the extent the design
professional participates in resolution of a claim based on
negligence, recklessness, intentional tort, intellectual
property infringement, or failure to pay a sub-consultant or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb699-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 699 2026
supplier that is committed by the design professional or the
design professional's agent, consultant under contract, or other
entity for which the design professional is legally liable.
(b) Requires the design professional to defend a
contracting party, an indemnitee, or a third party against a
claim arising out of the rendering of or failure to render
professional services by the design professional or its agents
that is not otherwise covered by the design professional's
policy of professional liability insurance.
(c) Requires the design professional to list a party or
any other person or entity as an additional insured on the
design professional's policy of professional liability
insurance.
(d) Subjects the design professional to a standard of care
that differs from that provided under subsection (4).
(3) This section does not apply to the following
provisions in a professional services contract entered into with
a design professional on or after July 1, 2026:
(a) A requirement that the design professional list an
additional insured on the design professional's general
liability insurance policy, automobile liability insurance
policy, or both, and provide coverage and any defense provided
by those policies.
(b) A provision for the reimbursement of a contracting
party's or an indemnitee's reasonable attorney fees, damages,
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb699-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 699 2026
losses, injuries, or other litigation costs in proportion to the
design professional's liability, or in proportion to the extent
the design professional participates in resolution of a claim
also made against the contracting party or indemnitee.
(c) A provision or requirement not otherwise in conflict
with subsection (2).
(4)(a) A professional services contract entered into with
a design professional shall require the design professional to
perform the services with the professional skill and care
ordinarily provided by a competent design professional
practicing under the same or similar circumstances and
professional licenses as expeditiously as is prudent considering
the ordinary professional skill and care of a competent design
professional.
(b) If a standard of care provision in a contract differs
from the skill and care required under paragraph (a), the
standard of care provided in paragraph (a) applies.
(5) This section does not prohibit parties to a
professional services contract from including and enforcing
conditions that relate to the scope, fees, and schedule of a
project that is subject to the contract, provided the conditions
are subject to the standard of care requirements in subsection
(4).
(6) To the extent not otherwise prohibited by law, this
100 section does not make a public agency responsible for, or to
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb699-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 699 2026
101 authorize a design professional to include in a contract, any
102 provision making the public agency responsible for the design
103 professional's proportionate liability for negligence in
104 rendering professional services or liability arising out of the
105 design professional's nonprofessional actions in connection with
106 its performance for or on behalf of the public agency.
107 (7) This section does not affect the validity of any
108 existing insurance contract, workers' compensation, or any
109 agreement or coverage document issued by an insurer.
110 (8) Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding,
111 this section may not be interpreted to alter or affect state
112 joint and several liability law or workers' compensation law.
113 (9) This section does not affect contracts or agreements
114 entered into before July 1, 2026.
115 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb699-00